Washington statutes.
RCW 35.38.040

Segregation of collateral.

Before any such designation shall entitle the treasurer to make deposits in any financial institution, each financial institution so designated shall segregate eligible securities as collateral as provided by RCW 39.58.050 as now or hereafter amended.

[ 1984 c 177 s 2; 1973 c 126 s 3; 1969 ex.s. c 193 s 25; 1967 c 132 s 6; 1965 c 7 s 35.38.040. Prior: 1945 c 240 s 2; 1935 c 45 s 3; 1931 c 87 s 5; 1909 c 40 s 1; 1907 c 22 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 5572.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 193: See notes following RCW 39.58.010.